Massachusetts, session 194th, H3052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 38NN the
following section:-
Section 38OO.
(a) For the purposes of this section the following word “Living wage” shall mean the
remuneration received for a standard workweek by a worker in the commonwealth sufficient to
afford a decent standard of living for the worker and their family as determined by the MIT
Living Wage Calculator. Elements of a decent standard of living include food, water, housing,
education, health care, transportation, clothing and other essential needs including provision for
unexpected events.
of 3

(b) A corporation that has elected to be a benefit corporation pursuant to chapter 156E
shall be allowed a preferential tax rate equal to the Commonwealth’s corporate tax rate, minus
1.5% points for providing certain benefits to its employees if it meets the standards laid out in
section (c) and certified by the department of revenue pursuant to subsection (d).
(c) To be eligible for the tax rate benefit under this section a benefit corporation shall:
(1) offer at least 4 of the following 6 employee benefits:
(i) a living wage;
(ii) paid parental leave for 12 weeks following the birth or adoption of a child;
(iii) flexible spending accounts;
(iv) a chief executive officer-to-lowest paid employee compensation ratio of no greater
than 25:1; and
(v) the election of the benefit corporation to be governed as an employee cooperative
pursuant to chapter 157A;
(vi) profit sharing provisions that return at least 10% of the corporate profits to the
employees;
(2) receive certification from the department of revenue pursuant to subsection (d);
(3) offer at least 4 of the employee benefits listed in paragraph (1) for at least 12
consecutive months prior to and in the taxable year in which the tax rate benefit is claimed.
of 3

(d) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations to establish a certification process for
benefit corporations that offer 4 of the employee benefits listed in paragraph (1) of subsection
(c).
(f) The state secretary, in consultation with the commissioner, shall promulgate
regulations establishing an application process for determining eligibility for the preferential tax
rate.
of 3